Washington statutes.
RCW 8.25.260

Special benefits to remaining property—Lien foreclosure proceedings—Stay.

A condemnor may foreclose the lien authorized by RCW 8.25.220 by bringing an action and applying for summary judgment pursuant to civil rule 56 and may execute first upon the remainder property but such proceedings shall not be commenced before five years time has passed from the date of acquisition by the condemnor. A property owner may stay proceedings to enforce the lien authorized by RCW 8.25.220 by commencement of an action to try the matter of special benefits.

[ 1974 ex.s. c 79 s 6.]